Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF59.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1093XS (1) 91 jm/jh S.F. 59 Section 1. Section 422.7, subsection 14, paragraph e, Code 1 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph and inserting in 2 lieu thereof the following: 3 e. Net income from a farm tenancy agreement earned, 4 received, or reported by an entity taxed as a disregarded 5 entity, partnership for federal tax purposes, an S corporation, 6 a trust, or estate is eligible for the election and deduction 7 in this subsection for the portion of net income derived from 8 a farm tenancy agreement if the eligible individual receives 9 or is entitled to receive the portion of net income through 10 distributions from an entity taxed as a disregarded entity, 11 a partnership, an S corporation, a trust, or an estate, to 12 the same extent that an eligible individual could subtract 13 net income received directly from the farm tenant rather than 14 passing to the eligible individual through an entity taxed 15 as a disregarded entity, a partnership, an S corporation, a 16 trust, or an estate. For purposes of this paragraph, net 17 income accruing to a grantor trust or to a business entity 18 that is a disregarded entity shall be deemed to have been 19 distributed to its sole owner to the extent the sole owner of 20 such disregarded entity or trust has the right to withdraw or 21 compel distribution of such net income. 22 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 23 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 24 Sec. 3. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 25 retroactively to January 1, 2024, for tax years beginning on 26 or after that date. 27